Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Chapter 06. Pipeline Act.

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Legislative history reports. —

For report of the Free Conference Committee on ch. 139, SLA 1972 (FCCS HCS CSSB 314), see 1972 Senate Journal, p. 1072; or 1972 House Journal, p. 1420.

Collateral references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d, Carriers, §§ 20 — 32, 75 — 104.

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Pipelines, § 1 et seq.

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Utilities, § 292 et seq.

13 C.J.S., Carriers, §§ 15 — 24.

Secs. 42.06.010 — 42.06.050.
Legislative policy; Alaska Pipeline Commission. [Repealed,
§ 20 ch 110 SLA 1981.]